Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1068.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Families Providing Extraordinary Care Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual who submits an application to the board under section 3 to become a licensed family member."Board." The State Board of Nursing."Child." An individual younger than 21 years of age with a 12345678910111213141516171819 diagnosed medical condition for which shift nursing care is needed."Covered skilled care." Medically necessary skilled care within a recipient's Medicaid or home and community-based services waiver benefit during an authorization period, including skilled monitoring, and the unskilled health care necessary during the same authorization period to the same extent a nurse would be paid for an authorized shift."Decision-maker." Any of the following:(1) A parent, health care representative or legal guardian of a child who makes decisions on behalf of the child.(2) In the case of a child 18 years of age or older who does not have a parent, health care representative or legal guardian, the child or an individual selected by the child to make decisions on the child's behalf."Designated child." A child designated by a licensed family member to receive skilled care by the licensed family member."Eligible family member." Any of the following:(1) A parent or legal guardian of a child.(2) A stepparent, grandparent, aunt, uncle or adult sibling of a child.(3) A person living with a child.(4) In the case of a child 18 years of age or older, the individual selected by the child to be the child's decision-maker."Licensed family member." An individual licensed to provide skilled care to a child for compensation under this act."Medicaid agency." The Office of Medical Assistance Programs within the Department of Human Services or any of its contracted 20250HB1068PN1168 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 managed care organizations."Parent." A biological or adoptive parent."Recipient." A child who is enrolled in the medical assistance program administered by the Department of Human Services."Skilled care." Care related to the practice of practical nursing as defined in section 2(1) of the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1211, No.376), known as the Practical Nurse Law."Supervising agency." A Medicare-certified home health agency or any other similar entity designated by the Department of Human Services.Section 3. Application for licensure.(a) Submission.--In accordance with this act, an individual may submit an application to the board to provide skilled care to a designated child for compensation as a licensed family member in a form and manner determined by the board.(b) Process.--The board shall be responsible for the licensure of applicants, including obtaining and maintaining proof of qualifications under section 4, and shall use the same procedures as used for licensed practical nurses under the act of March 2, 1956 (1955 P.L.1211, No.376), known as the Practical Nurse Law.Section 4. Qualifications for licensure.In order to qualify as a licensed family member, an applicant shall demonstrate proof of all of the following to the board in an application submitted under section 3:(1) The applicant is an eligible family member.(2) The applicant complies with the training requirements specified under section 5, including receipt of a written verification of competency from the training entity 20250HB1068PN1168 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 5(5).(3) The applicant has received a Pennsylvania Child Abuse History Clearance.Section 5. Training requirements for applicants and licensed family members.The following shall apply:(1) An applicant or a licensed family member shall comply with the training requirements of 42 CFR 484.80(b) (relating to condition of participation: home health aide services).(2) An applicant or licensed family member shall also train in all medical and therapeutic procedures necessary for a designated child.(3) A hospital or supervising agency may provide the training specified under this subsection.(4) A Medicaid agency shall ensure that training programs under this subsection are available, timely and offered in multiple languages or with interpretation support.(5) In order to receive a written verification of competency from a training entity under this subsection, an applicant or licensed family member shall demonstrate an understanding of the needs of a designated child and the ability to perform all required care to the satisfaction of the training entity.(6) If a designated child is a recipient, a Medicaid agency shall pay for all of the following:(i) The initial training of an applicant under this subsection and licensure renewal training every two years thereafter.(ii) Covered authorized care for the recipient while 20250HB1068PN1168 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the applicant is being trained under this subsection.(iii) Specialized training under this subsection that is needed by the recipient's supervising nurse as determined by a supervising agency.(iv) Training under this subsection for an eligible family member of the recipient, regardless of whether or not the eligible family member is seeking licensure as a licensed family member. Section 6. Employment and compensation of licensed family members.(a) Employment.--(1) A licensed family member must be employed by a supervising agency. The board shall place the license of a licensed family member who ceases employment with a supervising agency in inactive status.(2) A supervising agency shall use the supervising agency's professional judgment in hiring, terminating or refusing employment to a licensed family member. A supervising agency may not adopt a policy prohibiting the hiring of licensed family members as employees of the supervising agency.(3) A supervising agency shall plan for and make every effort to ensure that a nonfamily member nurse is available to a designated child when a licensed family member or a scheduled nurse is unavailable to provide skilled care to the child.(4) A supervising agency shall provide all employment-related requirements to a licensed family member in the language of the licensed family member's choice.(b) Compensation.--20250HB1068PN1168 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A Medicaid agency shall, and any other insurer may, compensate a licensed family member for the covered skilled care provided to a recipient, provided that the licensed family member is employed by a supervising agency. A Medicaid agency may not reimburse a supervising agency for a licensed family member at a rate lower than the reimbursement rate for a licensed practical nurse.(2) A supervising agency shall compensate a licensed family member at a rate commensurate with a licensed practical nurse. A supervising agency shall compensate a licensed family member for overtime when the licensed family member works more than 40 hours per week at the supervising agency. A supervising agency shall compensate an employed licensed family member for planned shifts and for filling unfilled shifts.(3) Upon the hiring of a licensed family member, a supervising agency shall have the following duties:(i) Ensure that the licensed family member and the decision-maker sign an agreement indicating whether the licensed family member is the primary skilled caregiver for a designated child for a specified number of hours per week, or whether each party prefers that the supervising agency identify all available nurses for the designated child.(ii) Compensate the licensed family member for filling in when a nurse is not available for the designated child.(iii) Submit a copy of the agreement under subparagraph (i) to the designated child's Medicaid agency, decision-maker and the licensed family member 20250HB1068PN1168 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within seven days of the execution of the agreement. The licensed family member or the designated child's decision-maker may elect to change the agreement under subparagraph (i) by notifying the supervising agency and the Medicaid agency in writing.(4) In a calculation of coverage for authorized nursing hours for recipients individually or collectively, for a shift that was filled by a licensed family member, not including a shift for which the licensed family member opted to be a primary skilled caregiver under paragraph (3)(i), the supervising agency and the Medicaid agency shall report the shift as a missed shift.Section 7. Limitations and supervision of licensed family members.(a) Limitations.--(1) A licensed family member may be scheduled to provide skilled care up to 12 hours per day, but shall be compensated for additional hours when there is no nurse available.(2) A licensed family member may not deny a designated child reasonable opportunities for socialization, community integration and growing independence.(3) A license issued to a licensed family member shall only authorize the licensed family member to receive compensation for skilled care provided to a designated child.(4) A Medicaid agency may not require a family member to become a licensed family member or a licensed family member to accept an employment position with a supervising agency. A Medicaid agency or supervising agency may not require a licensed family member to accept a shift that the licensed 20250HB1068PN1168 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 family member has not agreed to cover.(b) Supervision.--A supervising agency shall provide in-person supervision of a licensed family member as often as deemed medically necessary by a physician, but no less than every two weeks by a registered nurse or by a skilled nurse who has been trained in the specific needs of the designated child. The supervising agency shall make an appropriately trained nurse available to the licensed family member at all times. The supervising nurse shall document each area in which the licensed family member needs additional or repeated training and the supervising agency shall ensure that the training is provided to the licensed family member.Section 8. Notice to parents of recipients.A Medicaid agency shall notify each parent of a recipient in writing within 14 days of a request for authorization of nursing of the procedures for becoming a licensed family member. The notice shall include information on how to file a complaint or request information with the Department of Human Services regarding any issue related to the parent's application, training, work or supervision under this act.Section 9. Authorization of covered skilled care.A Medicaid agency shall authorize covered skilled care based on the medical needs of a recipient without reference to whether covered skilled care is provided by a licensed nurse or a licensed family member. A Medicaid agency may not deny authorization for covered skilled care on the basis that a family member is a licensed family member or available to provide the skilled care.Section 10. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent a parent or 20250HB1068PN1168 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parental designee from providing skilled care to a child without compensation or in any circumstance otherwise permitted by Federal or State law. Nothing in this act shall be construed to discharge a Medicaid agency of the duty to provide all medically necessary home health services.Section 11. State plan amendment or Federal waiver.If a State plan amendment or Federal waiver necessary for the provisions of this act is approved or is not necessary, the Secretary of Human Services shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 11 and this section shall take effect immediately.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect 60 days after the publication of the notice under section 11.20250HB1068PN1168 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617